Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [13.357] DATA SHARING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (a) "Public program" means any program funded by a state or federal agency that involves transfer or disbursement of public funds or other public resources. new text end new text begin (b) "Fraud" means an intentional or deliberate act to deprive another of property or money or to acquire property or money by deception or other unfair means. Fraud includes intentionally submitting false information to a federal, state, or local government entity for the purpose of obtaining a greater compensation or benefit than that to which the person is legally entitled. Fraud includes acts that constitute a crime against any program, or acts that attempt or conspire to commit those crimes, including but not limited to theft in violation of section 609.52, perjury in violation of section 609.48, and aggravated forgery and forgery in violation of sections 609.625 and 609.63, and substantially similar federal laws. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Authority to share data regarding fraud in public programs. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary specifically prohibiting data sharing, any government entity may disclose data relating to suspected or confirmed fraud in public programs to any other government entity, federal agency, or law enforcement agency if the access would promote the protection of public resources, promote the integrity of public programs, or aid the law enforcement process. new text end